Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.801

Taxes collected in annexed territory—Notification of annexation.

(1) Whenever any territory is annexed to a code city which is part of a road district of the county and road district taxes have been levied but not collected on any property within the annexed territory, the same shall when collected by the county treasurer be paid to the code city and by the city placed in the city street fund; except that road district taxes that are delinquent before the date of annexation shall be paid to the county and placed in the county road fund.

(2) When territory that is part of a fire district is annexed to a code city, the following apply:

(a) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the annexation shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing code city at times required by the county, but no less frequently than by July 10th for collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections through December 31st following the annexation; and

(b) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation and the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the fire district.

(3) When territory that is part of a library district is annexed to a code city, the following apply:

(a) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the annexation shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing code city at times required by the county, but no less frequently than by July 10th for collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections through December 31st following the annexation; and

(b) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation and the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the library district.

(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any special assessments due in behalf of such property.

(5) If a code city annexes property within a fire district or library district while any general obligation bond secured by the taxing authority of the district is outstanding, the bonded indebtedness of the fire district or library district remains an obligation of the taxable property annexed as if the annexation had not occurred.

(6) For each annexation by a code city, the code city must provide notification, by certified mail or electronic means, that includes a list of annexed parcel numbers and the street address to the county treasurer and assessor, to the light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses, and to the fire district and library district, as appropriate, at least sixty days before the effective date of the annexation. The county treasurer is only required to remit to the code city those road taxes, fire district taxes, and library district taxes collected sixty or more days after receipt of the notification. The light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses are only required to remit to the *city or town those utility taxes collected sixty days or more after receipt of the notification.

(7)(a) In counties that do not have a boundary review board, the code city shall provide notification to the fire district or library district of the jurisdiction's resolution approving the annexation. The notification required under this subsection must:

(i) Be made by certified mail within seven days of the resolution approving the annexation; and

(ii) Include a description of the annexed area.

(b) In counties that have a boundary review board, the code city shall provide notification of the proposed annexation to the fire district or library district simultaneously when notice of the proposed annexation is provided by the jurisdiction to the boundary review board under RCW 36.93.090.

(8) The provisions of this section regarding (a) the transfer of fire and library district property taxes and (b) code city notifications to fire and library districts do not apply if the code city has been annexed to and is within the fire or library district when the code city approves a resolution to annex unincorporated county territory.

(9) An error or accidental omission by a code city in the transmitted annexation notice required under this section may be corrected by the city by providing an amended notice to the county treasurer and assessor, the light and power businesses, the gas distribution businesses, and to the fire district and library district, as appropriate. The recipient of the amended notice is only required to remit applicable taxes to the city, in accordance with the corrected information, sixty days after its receipt of the amended notice.

(10) For purposes of this section, "electronic means" means an electronic format agreed to by both sender and recipient that conveys all applicable notification information.

[ 2014 c 123 s 2; 2007 c 285 s 2; 2001 c 299 s 3; 1998 c 106 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "city or town" appears to be erroneous. "Code city" was apparently intended.